Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201379-559
Class II, III,
IV, or VI school
district; school board or board of education; student member; term; qualifications.

(1) The school board or board of education of any Class II,
III, IV, or
VI school district may include at least one nonvoting member who is a public
high school student from the district. If the board elects to include such
a nonvoting student member, the student member shall serve for a term of one
year, beginning on September 1, and shall be the student body or student council
president, the senior class representative, or a representative elected from
and by the entire student body, as designated by the voting members of the
board.

(2) Any nonvoting student member of the board has the privilege
of attending all open meetings of the board but shall be excluded from executive
sessions.

Laws 1982, LB 440, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-547.02;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 312;

Laws 2013, LB125, § 7.
February 12, 2013